Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 13. Crimes and Criminal Procedure

Executive Order No. 13-1
(No. 33-87A) [Criminal Justice Center.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order 09-10 and 10-10 (codified as Executive Order Nos. 13-5 and 13-6), dated November 3, 2010.

Executive Order No. 13-2
(No. 17-03) [Governor’s Commission on Corrections Overcrowding.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 17A-03 (codified as Executive Order No. 13-3), dated November 17, 2003.

Executive Order No. 13-3
(No. 17A-03) [Governor’s Commission on Corrections Overcrowding.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-50 (codified as Executive Order 10-09), dated December 23, 2009.

Executive Order No. 13-4
(No. 01-07) [Vermont Victim/Survivor Crime Council.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-50 (codified as Executive Order 10-09), dated December 23, 2009.

Executive Order No. 13-5
(No. 09-10) [Vermont Center for Justice Research.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 13-7 (codified as Executive Order No. 06-14), dated November 4, 2014.

Executive Order No. 13-6
(No. 10-10) [Criminal Justice Cabinet.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 3-61 (codified as Executive Order No. 02-14), dated June 17, 2014.

Executive Order No. 13-7
(No. 06-14) [Vermont’s Statistical Analysis Center.

WHEREAS, consistent and available data about the occurrence of crime and the effects of the response to crime is needed by various agencies so that policies can be coordinated and costs can be controlled; and

WHEREAS, state and local government need access to federal resources relating to the administration of criminal and juvenile justice; and

WHEREAS, the U.S. Department of Justice, Bureau of Justice Statistics (“BJS”) provides funds to states’ statistical analysis centers to coordinate criminal justice statistical information, to conduct research to assist criminal justice policymakers, and
to serve as a liaison between the State and BJS.

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED that I, Peter Shumlin, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor, do hereby designate the Department of Public Safety as Vermont’s statistical analysis center. The Center, directly or through contracted services, shall
collect and analyze criminal and juvenile justice data, and produce general information and statistical reports on crime, criminal and juvenile offenders, and the administration of criminal and juvenile justice.

The Center shall be authorized, in accordance with

32 V.S.A. § 5(a)
, to apply for and to receive federal and other grants and funds as may be available, including funds available from the Bureau of Justice Statistics and from the Bureau of Justice Assistance.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and supersedes and replaces Executive Order 9-10 (codified as 13-5) dated November 3, 2010, on the same subject.

Dated November 4, 2014.